Massachusetts, session 194th, H3307.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 40 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
section:-
Section 70. (a) For purposes of this section, the term “Hostile architecture” shall, unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, mean any building or structure that is designed or
intended to prevent unhoused individuals from sitting or lying on the building or structure at
street level; provided, that hostile architecture shall not include design elements intended to
prevent individuals from skateboarding or rollerblading or to prevent vehicles from entering
certain areas.
of 3

(b) A municipality shall not install or construct hostile architecture in any publicly
accessible building or on publicly accessible real property owned by or under the control of the
municipality.
SECTION 2. Chapter 7C of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 73. (a) For purposes of this section, the term “Hostile architecture” shall, unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, mean any building or structure that is designed or
intended to prevent unhoused individuals from sitting or lying on the building or structure at
street level; provided, that hostile architecture shall not include design elements intended to
prevent individuals from skateboarding or rollerblading or to prevent vehicles from entering
certain areas.
(b) The commissioner shall not install or construct hostile architecture in any publicly
accessible capital facility or on publicly accessible real property under the commissioner’s
control or supervision.
SECTION 3. Chapter 161A of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 53. (a) For purposes of this section, the term “Hostile architecture” shall, unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, mean any building or structure that is designed or
intended to prevent unhoused individuals from sitting or lying on the building or structure at
street level; provided, that hostile architecture shall not include design elements intended to
prevent individuals from skateboarding or rollerblading or to prevent vehicles from entering
certain areas.
of 3

(b) The authority shall not install or construct hostile architecture in any publicly
accessible mass transportation facilities under the authority’s control or supervision.
SECTION 4. Chapter 265 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 73. (a) For purposes of this section, the term “Hostile architecture” shall, unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, mean any building or structure that is designed or
intended to prevent unhoused individuals from sitting or lying on the building or structure at
street level; provided, that hostile architecture shall not include design elements intended to
prevent individuals from skateboarding or rollerblading or to prevent vehicles from entering
certain areas.
(b) Whoever installs or constructs hostile architecture on any publicly accessible real
property shall be punished by a fine of not more than $500 for each day in violation of this
section.
of 3